Washington statutes.
RCW 16.50.170

Penalty for violations.

Any person violating any provision of this chapter or of any rule adopted hereunder is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars or confinement in the county jail for not more than ninety days.

[ 1967 c 31 s 7.]